Washington statutes.
RCW 15.35.120

Qualifications for producers to sign petitions or vote in referendums.

(1) The producers qualified to sign a petition, or to vote in any referendum concerning a market pool, shall be all those producers shipping milk to the market area on a regular supply basis and who would or do receive or pay equalization in an existing market pool in a market area, or in a market pool if established in such market area.

(2) The milk dealers qualified to vote in any referendum establishing a market pool shall be all those milk dealers who operate a plant which is located within the state and who would receive milk priced under a market pool if established in such market area.

(3) The director is authorized during business hours to review the books and records of milk dealers to obtain a list of the producers qualified to sign petitions or to vote in referendums and to verify that such milk dealers are qualified to vote in a referendum.

[ 1991 c 239 s 9; 1971 ex.s. c 230 s 12.]